North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
ARTICLE 4. Satisfaction.
§ 45-36.9. Secured creditor to submit satisfaction or release for recording; liability for failure.

A secured creditor shall submit for recording a satisfaction of a security instrument within 30 days after the creditor receives full payment or performance of the secured obligation. If a security instrument secures a line of credit or future advances, the secured obligation is fully performed only if, in addition to full payment, the secured creditor has received (i) a notification requesting the creditor to terminate the line of credit, (ii) a credit suspension directive, or (iii) a notification containing a clear and unambiguous statement sufficient to terminate the effectiveness of the provision for future advances in the security instrument including, but not limited to, a request to terminate an equity line of credit given pursuant to

G.S. 45-82.2

or a notice regarding future advances given pursuant to

G.S. 45-82.3

.

(a1)
If the conditions stated in a short-pay statement are fully satisfied on or before the short-pay date stated in the short-pay statement, including the payment in full of the short-pay amount and the satisfaction of all other conditions precedent to the release set forth in the short-pay statement, then within 30 days after the short-pay date the secured creditor shall release the property which is the subject of the short-pay statement from the lien of the security instrument. The release of the property may be accomplished by a deed of release, an instrument of full or partial reconveyance, a partial release recorded pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.22

, the satisfaction of record of the security instrument by any of the means authorized in G.S. 45-37(a), or by any other lawful means.

Except as otherwise provided in

G.S. 45-36.12

, a secured creditor that is required to submit a satisfaction of a security instrument or a release for recording pursuant to this section and does not do so by the end of the period specified in subsection (a) or (a1) of this section is liable to the landowner for any actual damages caused by the failure, but not punitive damages.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section and in

G.S. 45-36.12

, a secured creditor that is required to submit a satisfaction of a security instrument or a release for recording pursuant to this section and does not do so by the end of the period specified in subsection (a) or (a1) of this section is also liable to the landowner for one thousand dollars ($1,000) and any reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs incurred if, after the expiration of the period specified in subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, all of the following occur:

The landowner gives the secured creditor a notification, by any method authorized by

G.S. 45-36.5

that provides proof of receipt, demanding that the secured creditor submit a satisfaction or release for recording.

The secured creditor does not submit a satisfaction or release for recording within 30 days after the secured creditor's receipt of the notification.

The security instrument is not satisfied of record by any of the methods provided in G.S. 45-37(a) or the release is not filed within 30 days after the secured creditor's receipt of the notification.

The right to receive the additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) is personal to the landowner who gives the secured creditor notification under this subsection and may not be assigned.

Subsection (c) of this section does not apply if the secured creditor received full payment or performance of the secured obligation before October 1, 2005.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-246, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2011-246, s. 3; 2011-312, s. 8; 2013-204, s. 2.1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-246, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011, repealed subsection (e).

Session Laws 2011-312, s. 8, effective October 1, 2011, in the section catchline, inserted "or release"; in the last sentence of subsection (a), inserted "(i)," "(ii) a credit suspension directive," "(iii) a notification" and "a clear and unambiguous," and added "including, but not limited to, a request to terminate an equity line of credit given pursuant to

G.S. 45-82.2

or a notice regarding future advances given pursuant to

G.S. 45-82.3

"; and added subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.1, effective June 26, 2013, in subsections (b) and (c), added "or a release," "pursuant to this section" and "or (a1)"; added "or release" in subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(2); and added "or the release is not filed" in subdivision (c)(3).

§ 45-36.10. Content and effect of satisfaction.

A document is a satisfaction of a security instrument if it does all of the following:

Identifies the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

States that the person signing the satisfaction is the secured creditor.

Reserved.

Contains language terminating the effectiveness of the security instrument.

Is signed by the secured creditor and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property.

The register of deeds shall accept for recording a satisfaction of a security instrument, unless one of the following applies:

The document is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law.

The document is not signed by the secured creditor and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in any satisfaction document, or (ii) the authority of the person executing any satisfaction document to do so.

Unless the satisfaction expressly states that the underlying obligation secured by the security instrument has been extinguished and the underlying note or other instrument evidencing the obligation has been cancelled, the recording of a satisfaction of a security instrument does not by itself extinguish any liability of a person for payment or performance of the secured obligation.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2015-56, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2015-56, s. 1, effective June 4, 2015, substituted "Unless the satisfaction expressly states that the underlying obligation secured by the security instrument has been extinguished and the underlying note or other instrument evidencing the obligation has been cancelled, the" for "The" at the beginning of subsection (c).

§ 45-36.11. Satisfaction: form.

Standard Form. - No particular phrasing is required for a satisfaction of a security instrument. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of G.S. 45-36.10(a):

The undersigned is now the secured creditor in the security instrument identified as follows:

Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)

Original Grantor(s): (Identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))

Original Secured Party(ies): (Identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)

Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ______________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ________________________ County, North Carolina.

Alternate Form. - A secured creditor who would like to indicate that the underlying obligation secured by the instrument has been extinguished may use the following form, which, when properly completed, is also sufficient to satisfy the requirements of G.S. 45-36.10(a):

"SATISFACTION OF SECURITY INSTRUMENT

(G.S. 45-36.10; G.S. 45-37(a)(7))

This satisfaction terminates the effectiveness of the security instrument.

Date: ____________________________
__________________________________
(Signature of secured creditor)

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]"

"SATISFACTION OF SECURITY INSTRUMENT

(G.S. 45-36.10; G.S. 45-37(a)(7))

The undersigned is now the secured creditor in the security instrument identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (Identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (Identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ______________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ________________________ County, North Carolina.
This satisfaction terminates the effectiveness of the security instrument and extinguishes the underlying obligation secured by the instrument.
Date: ____________________________
__________________________________
(Signature of secured creditor)

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]".

(2005-123, s. 1; 2012-150, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2012-150, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012, added the subsection (a) designation and added subsection (b); and inserted "Standard Form" at the beginning of subsection (a). For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 45-36.12. Limitation of secured creditor's liability.

A secured creditor is not liable under this Article if it:

Established a reasonable procedure to achieve compliance with its obligations under this Article;

Complied with that procedure in good faith; and

Was unable to comply with its obligations because of circumstances beyond its control.

(2005-123, s. 1.)

§ 45-36.13. Eligibility to serve as satisfaction agent.

No person other than an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of North Carolina may serve as a satisfaction agent under this Article.

(2005-123, s. 1.)

§ 45-36.14. Affidavit of satisfaction: notification to secured creditor.

If a secured creditor has not submitted for recording a satisfaction of a security instrument and the security instrument has not been satisfied of record by any of the methods provided by G.S. 45-37(a) within the period specified in G.S. 45-36.9(a), a satisfaction agent acting for and with authority from the landowner may give the secured creditor a notification that the satisfaction agent intends to submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of the security instrument. The notification must include all of the following:

The identity and mailing address of the satisfaction agent.

Identification of the security instrument for which a recorded satisfaction is sought, including the names of the original parties to, and the recording data for, the security instrument.

A statement that the satisfaction agent has reasonable grounds to believe that:

The person to whom the notification is being given is the secured creditor; and

The secured creditor has received full payment or performance of the secured obligation.

A statement that the security instrument has not been satisfied of record.

A statement that the satisfaction agent, acting with the authorization of the owner of the real property described in the security instrument, intends to sign and submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of the security instrument unless, within 30 days after the effective date of the notification:

The secured creditor submits a satisfaction of the security instrument for recording;

The satisfaction agent receives from the secured creditor a notification stating that the secured obligation remains unsatisfied;

The satisfaction agent receives from the secured creditor a notification stating that the secured creditor has assigned the security instrument and identifying the name and address of the assignee; or

The security instrument is satisfied of record by any of the methods provided in G.S. 45-37(a).

A notification under subsection (a) of this section must be sent by a method authorized by

G.S. 45-36.5

that provides proof of receipt to the secured creditor's address for giving a notification for the purpose of requesting a payoff statement or, if the satisfaction agent cannot ascertain that address, to the secured creditor's address for notification for any other purpose.

This Article does not require a person to agree to serve as a satisfaction agent.

A satisfaction agent does not have to give the notification described in this section if (i) the secured creditor has authorized the satisfaction agent to sign and submit an affidavit of satisfaction; (ii) the satisfaction agent has in his or her possession the instruments described in G.S. 45-36.15(a)(3), (a)(4), or (a)(5); or (iii) after diligent inquiry, the satisfaction agent has been unable to determine the identity of the secured creditor because, for example, the last known secured creditor no longer exists and the satisfaction agent has been unable to identify any successor-in-interest to the last known secured creditor.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 2.2.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.2, effective June 26, 2013, added subsection (d).

§ 45-36.15. Affidavit of satisfaction: authorization to submit for recording.

Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a satisfaction agent may sign and submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument complying with

G.S. 45-36.16

if the satisfaction agent has reasonable grounds to believe that the secured creditor has received full payment or performance of the secured obligation and one or more of the following apply:

The secured creditor has not, to the knowledge of the satisfaction agent, submitted for recording a satisfaction of a security instrument or otherwise caused the security instrument to be satisfied of record pursuant to any of the methods provided in G.S. 45-37(a) within 30 days after the effective date of a notification complying with

G.S. 45-36.14(a)

.

The secured creditor has authorized the satisfaction agent to sign and submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction.

The satisfaction agent has in his or her possession the original security instrument and the original bond, note, or other instrument secured thereby, with an endorsement of payment and satisfaction appearing thereon made by one or more of the following: (i) the secured creditor; (ii) the trustee or substitute trustee, if the security instrument is a deed of trust; (iii) an assignee of the secured creditor; or (iv) any bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union chartered under the laws of North Carolina or any other state or the United States having an office or branch in North Carolina, when so endorsed in the name of the institution by an officer thereof.

The satisfaction agent has in his or her possession the original security instrument intended to secure the payment of money or the performance of any other obligation, together with the original bond, note, or other instrument secured, or the original security instrument alone if the security instrument itself sets forth the obligation secured or other obligation to be performed and does not call for or recite any note, bond, or other instrument secured by it if, at the time the affidavit of satisfaction is to be signed and submitted, all such instruments are more than 10 years old counting from the maturity date of the last obligation secured. If the instrument or instruments secured by the security instrument have an endorsement of partial payment, satisfaction, performance, or discharge within the period of 10 years, the period of 10 years shall be counted from the date of the most recent endorsement.

The satisfaction agent has in his or her possession the original security instrument given to secure the bearer or holder of any negotiable instruments transferable solely by delivery, together with all the evidences of indebtedness secured thereby, marked paid and satisfied in full and signed by the bearer or holder thereof.

After diligent inquiry, the satisfaction agent has been unable to determine the identity of the secured creditor because, for example, the last known secured creditor no longer exists and the satisfaction agent has been unable to identify any successor-in-interest to the last known secured creditor.

A satisfaction agent may not sign and submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument if it has received a notification under G.S. 45-36.14(a)(5)b. stating that the secured obligation remains unsatisfied.

Unless the satisfaction agent has in his or her possession the instruments described in subdivision (a)(3), (a)(4), or (a)(5) of this section or the satisfaction agent is unable to determine the identity of the secured creditor because, for example, the last known assignee of the security instrument no longer exists and the satisfaction agent has been unable to identify any successor-in-interest to the last known assignee, a satisfaction agent who receives a notification under

G.S. 45-36.14

(a)(5)c. stating that the security instrument has been assigned may not submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of the security instrument without first:

Giving a notification of intent to submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction to the identified assignee at the identified address; and

Complying with

G.S. 45-36.14

with respect to the identified assignee.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 2.3.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.3, effective June 26, 2013, added "the satisfaction agent has reasonable grounds to believe that the secured creditor has received full payment or performance of the secured obligation and one or more of the following apply" at the end of the introductory language of subsection (a); substituted a period for "; or" at the end of subdivision (a)(1); in subdivision (a)(2), substituted "has authorized" for "authorizes" and "sign and submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction" for "do so"; added subdivisions (a)(3) through (a)(6); and rewrote (c).

§ 45-36.16. Affidavit of satisfaction: content.

An affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument must comply with all of the following:

Identify the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the secured creditor, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

State the basis upon which the person signing the affidavit is a satisfaction agent.

Reserved.

State that the person signing the affidavit has reasonable grounds to believe that the secured creditor has received full payment or performance of the secured obligation.

(4a) Reserved.

(4b) Reserved.

State one or more of the following, as applicable:

The person signing the affidavit, acting with the authority of the owner of the real property described in the security instrument, gave notification to the secured creditor in the manner prescribed by

G.S. 45-36.14

of his or her intention to sign and submit for recording an affidavit of satisfaction. More than 30 days have elapsed since the effective date of that notification, and the person signing the affidavit (i) has no knowledge that the secured creditor has submitted a satisfaction for recording and (ii) has not received a notification that the secured obligation remains unsatisfied.

The secured creditor authorized the person signing the affidavit to sign and record an affidavit of satisfaction.

The person signing the affidavit has in his or her possession the original security instrument and the original bond, note, or other instrument secured thereby, with an endorsement of payment and satisfaction appearing thereon made by one or more of the following: (i) the secured creditor; (ii) the trustee or substitute trustee, if the security instrument is a deed of trust; (iii) an assignee of the secured creditor; or (iv) a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union chartered under the laws of North Carolina or any other state or the United States having an office or branch in North Carolina, endorsed in the name of the institution by an officer thereof.

The person signing the affidavit has in his or her possession the original security instrument intended to secure the payment of money or the performance of any other obligation together with the original bond, note, or other instrument secured thereby, or the original security instrument alone if the security instrument itself sets forth the obligation secured or other obligation to be performed and does not call for or recite any note, bond, or other instrument secured by it. All such instruments are more than 10 years old counting from the maturity date of the last obligation secured. If the instrument or instruments secured by the security instrument have an endorsement of partial payment, satisfaction, performance, or discharge within the period of 10 years, the period of 10 years has been counted from the date of the most recent endorsement.

The person signing the affidavit has in his or her possession the original security instrument given to secure the bearer or holder of any negotiable instruments transferable solely by delivery, together with all the evidences of indebtedness secured thereby, marked paid and satisfied in full and signed by the bearer or holder thereof.

After diligent inquiry, the person signing the affidavit has been unable to determine the identity of the secured creditor.

, (7) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.4, effective June 26, 2013.

(8) Be signed and (i) acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property or (ii) sworn to or affirmed before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations.

(9) Copies of all or any part or parts of the instruments described in subdivision (5) of this section may be attached to and recorded with the affidavit of satisfaction.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 2.4.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.4, effective June 26, 2013, added subdivisions (4a) and (4b); rewrote subdivision (5);
deleted subdivisions (6) and (7); in subdivision (8), added "(i)" and "or (ii) sworn to or affirmed before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations"; and added subdivision (9).

§ 45-36.17. Affidavit of satisfaction: form.

No particular phrasing of an affidavit of satisfaction is required. The following form of affidavit, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.16

:

"AFFIDAVIT OF SATISFACTION

(G.S. 45-36.16, 45-36.17, 45-36.18)

__________________________________
(Date of Affidavit)
The undersigned hereby states as follows:
1. I am an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of North Carolina.
2. I am signing this Affidavit of Satisfaction to evidence full payment or performance of the obligations secured by real property covered by the following security instrument (the "security instrument"), which I believe is currently or was most recently held by ________ (the "secured creditor"):
Type of security instrument: _________________________________________________
Original Grantor(s): _________________________________________________________
Original Secured Party(ies): _________________________________________________
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ______________
at Page ______________ or as document number _________________________________
in the Office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina.
3. I have reasonable grounds to believe that the secured creditor has received full payment or performance of the balance of the obligations secured by the security instrument.
4. [Check appropriate box]
[ ] Acting with authorization from the owner of the real property described in the security instrument, I gave notification to the secured creditor in the manner prescribed by

G.S. 45-36.14

of my intention to sign and record an affidavit of satisfaction of the security instrument if, within 30 days after the effective date of the notification, the secured creditor did not submit a satisfaction of the security interest for recording or give notification that the secured obligation remains unsatisfied. The 30-day period has elapsed. I have no knowledge that the secured creditor has submitted a satisfaction for recording, and I have not received notification that the secured obligation remains unsatisfied.
[ ] I have been authorized by the secured creditor to execute and record this Affidavit of Satisfaction.
[ ] I have in my possession the original security instrument and the original bond, note, or other instrument secured thereby, with an endorsement of payment and satisfaction appearing thereon made by one or more of the following: (i) the secured creditor; (ii) the trustee or substitute trustee, if the security instrument is a deed of trust; (iii) an assignee of the secured creditor; or (iv) a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union chartered under the laws of North Carolina or any other state or the United States having an office or branch in North Carolina, endorsed in the name of the institution by an officer thereof.
[ ] I have in my possession the original security instrument together with the original bond, note, or other instrument secured thereby, or the original security instrument alone if the security instrument itself sets forth the obligation secured or other obligation to be performed and does not call for or recite any note, bond, or other instrument secured by it. All such instruments are more than 10 years old counting from the maturity date of the last obligation secured. If the instrument or instruments secured by the security instrument have an endorsement of partial payment, satisfaction, or performance or discharge within the period of 10 years, the period of 10 years has been counted from the date of the most recent endorsement.
[ ] I have in my possession the original security instrument given to secure the bearer or holder of any negotiable instruments transferable solely by delivery, together with all the evidences of indebtedness secured thereby, marked paid and satisfied in full and signed by the bearer or holder thereof.
[ ] After diligent inquiry, I have been unable to determine the identity of the secured creditor.
5. (If applicable) Attached to and filed with this Affidavit of Satisfaction are copies of all or part(s) of the following instruments: (Describe attached copies)
This Affidavit of Satisfaction constitutes a satisfaction of the security instrument pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.18

.
__________________________________
(Signature of Satisfaction Agent)
[Acknowledgment, oath, or affirmation before officer authorized to take acknowledgments and administer oaths and affirmations]"

(2005-123, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 2.5.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.5, effective June 26, 2013, rewrote the affidavit.

§ 45-36.18. Affidavit of satisfaction: effect.

Upon recording, an affidavit substantially complying with the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.16

constitutes a satisfaction of the security instrument described in the affidavit.

The recording of an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument does not by itself extinguish any liability of a person for payment or performance of the secured obligation.

The register of deeds may not refuse to accept for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument unless:

The affidavit is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law; or

The affidavit is not signed by the satisfaction agent and either (i) acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property or (ii) sworn to or affirmed before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in any affidavit of satisfaction, or (ii) the authority of the person executing any affidavit of satisfaction to do so.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 2.6.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.6, effective June 26, 2013, in subdivision (c)(2), added "either (i)" and "or (ii) sworn to or affirmed before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations."

§ 45-36.19. Liability of satisfaction agent.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a satisfaction agent or any person purporting to be a satisfaction agent that records or submits for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument erroneously or with knowledge that the statements contained in the affidavit are false is liable to the secured creditor for any actual damages caused by the recording and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

A satisfaction agent that records or submits for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument erroneously is not liable if the agent properly complied with this Article, gave notification to the secured creditor in the manner prescribed by

G.S. 45-36.14

, and the secured creditor did not respond in a timely manner to the notification pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.14

(a)(5).

If a satisfaction agent or any person purporting to be a satisfaction agent records or submits for recording an affidavit of satisfaction of a security instrument with knowledge that the statements contained in the affidavit are false, this section does not preclude any of the following:

A court from awarding punitive damages on account of the conduct.

The secured creditor from proceeding against the satisfaction agent or person purporting to be a satisfaction agent under law of this State other than this Article.

The enforcement of any criminal statute prohibiting the conduct.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 2.7.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.7, effective June 26, 2013, added "gave notification to the secured creditor in the manner prescribed by

G.S. 45-36.14

" in subsection (b).

§ 45-36.20. Trustee's satisfaction of deed of trust: content and effect.

Upon recording, a trustee's satisfaction substantially complying with the requirements of this section constitutes a satisfaction of the deed of trust described in the trustee's satisfaction.

The recording of a trustee's satisfaction does not by itself extinguish any liability of a person for payment or performance of the secured obligation.

This section applies only if the security instrument is a deed of trust. This section is not exclusive. Deeds of trust may also be satisfied of record by methods other than the filing of a trustee's satisfaction.

Document is a trustee's satisfaction of a deed of trust if it complies with all of the following:

Identifies the original parties to the deed of trust, the recording data for the deed of trust, and the office in which the deed of trust is recorded.

States that the person signing the trustee's satisfaction is then serving as trustee or substitute trustee under the terms of the deed of trust.

Contains language terminating the effectiveness of the deed of trust.

Is signed by the trustee or substitute trustee then serving under the terms of the deed of trust and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property.

The register of deeds shall accept for recording a trustee's satisfaction of a deed of trust, unless:

The trustee's satisfaction is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law; or

The trustee's satisfaction is not signed by the trustee or substitute trustee and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in any trustee's satisfaction, or (ii) the authority of the person executing any trustee's satisfaction to do so.

(2005-123, s. 1.)

§ 45-36.21. Trustee's satisfaction of deed of trust: form.

Standard Form. - No particular phrasing is required for a trustee's satisfaction of a deed of trust. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.20

:

Alternate Form. - A trustee and secured creditor who would like to indicate that the underlying obligation secured by the deed of trust has been extinguished may use the following form, which, when properly completed, is also sufficient to satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.20

:

"TRUSTEE'S SATISFACTION OF DEED OF TRUST

(G.S. 45-36.20; G.S. 45-37(a)(7))

The undersigned is now serving as the trustee or substitute trustee under the terms of the deed of trust identified as follows:
Original Grantor(s): (Identify original grantor(s) or trustor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (Identify the original beneficiary(ies) or secured party(ies) in the deed of trust)
Recording Data: The deed of trust is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ______________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for __________________ County, North Carolina.
This satisfaction terminates the effectiveness of the deed of trust.
Date:____________________________
____________________________________
(Signature of trustee or substitute trustee)

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]"

"TRUSTEE'S SATISFACTION OF DEED OF TRUST

AND

CREDITOR'S RELEASE

(G.S. 45-36.20; G.S. 45-37(a)(7))

The undersigned is now serving as the trustee or substitute trustee under the terms of the deed of trust identified as follows:
Original Grantor(s): (Identify original grantor(s) or trustor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (Identify the original beneficiary(ies) or secured party(ies) in the deed of trust)
Recording Data: The deed of trust is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ______________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ________________________ County, North Carolina.
This satisfaction terminates the effectiveness of the deed of trust.
Date:____________________________
____________________________________
(Signature of trustee or substitute trustee)

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]

The obligation secured by the deed of trust has been extinguished.
Date: ____________________________
___________________________________
(Signature of secured creditor)

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]".

(2005-123, s. 1; 2012-150, s. 2.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2012-150, s. 2, effective October 1, 2012, added the subsection (a) designation; added subsection (b);
and inserted "Standard Form" at the beginning of subsection (a). For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 45-36.22. Partial release: content and effect; form.

A document is a partial release if it does all of the following:

Identifies the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

States that the person signing the partial release is the secured creditor or, if the security instrument is a deed of trust, that the person or persons signing the partial release is or are the secured creditor, the trustee, or both the secured creditor and the trustee.

Contains language releasing property or an interest in property from the lien of the security instrument.

Is signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the secured creditor or, if the security instrument is a deed of trust, by the secured creditor, the trustee, or both the secured creditor and the trustee.

The register of deeds shall accept a partial release for recording unless one of the following applies:

The document is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law.

The required recording fee is not paid.

The document is not signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the secured creditor or, if the security instrument is a deed of trust, by the secured creditor, the trustee, or both the secured creditor and the trustee. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning the truth of the matters stated in any partial release or the authority of the person executing any partial release to do so.

Upon recording, a partial release shall release from the lien of the security instrument the property or interest in property as is expressly described and released. With respect only to the specific property or interest in property identified and released by a partial release, the partial release shall (i) operate and have the same effect as a duly executed and recorded deed of release or reconveyance of the property or interest in the property; (ii) release and discharge all of the secured creditor's interest in the property or property interest arising from the security instrument; and (iii) if the security instrument is a deed of trust, release and discharge all the interest of the trustee in the property or property interest arising from the deed of trust. The security instrument shall otherwise remain in full force and effect, and the remainder of the property and interests in property described in and encumbered by the security instrument shall remain subject to the lien of the security instrument.

The recording of a partial release does not by itself extinguish any liability of a person for payment or performance of the secured obligation.

The provisions of this section are not exclusive. Property and interests in property may be released from the lien of a security instrument by methods other than the filing of a partial release.

Unless the deed of trust provides otherwise, the trustee in a deed of trust is not a necessary party to a partial release.

No particular phrasing is required for a partial release. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of G.S. 45-36.22(a):

"PARTIAL RELEASE

(G.S. 45-36.22)

The security instrument that is the subject of this Partial Release is identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ______________ at Page ______________ or as document number ______________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for __________________ County, North Carolina.
The person or persons signing this Partial Release is/are: (check appropriate box)
[
] The secured creditor.
[
] The trustee or substitute trustee.
[
] The secured creditor and the trustee or substitute trustee.
The following described property or interest in property (and no other) is released from the lien of the security instrument: (identify legal description of property or interest in property to be released)
Date: ____________________________
__________________________________
Signature(s) of secured creditor
and/or trustee

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]".

(2011-312, s. 9.)